Louisiana, session 2026, HB500.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 30:1104.2(I) is hereby amended and reenacted to read as follows:
§1104.2. Unitization
* * *
I.(1) Except as provided in R.S. 30:1108(B)(2), nothing in this Section shall
prevent persons having the right to do so from drilling through the storage unit in
such manner as shall comply with the rules of the commissioner secretary issued for
the purpose of protecting the storage unit or an associated storage facility against
pollution or invasion and against the escape or migration of carbon dioxide.
(2) Any nonconsenting mineral interest owner who is prevented from
exploring for or producing minerals due to the presence of a storage unit shall be
compensated by the unit operator for the value of the minerals located beneath the
unit that the mineral interest owner would otherwise be able to explore for and
produce.
Page 1 of 2
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-300 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 500
(3) Any nonconsenting mineral interest owner permitted to drill through a
unit to explore for and produce minerals shall be reimbursed by the unit operator for
any additional material costs incurred to drill through the unit in compliance with
department requirements.
* * *